Washington statutes.
RCW 18.44.490

Authority to prosecute—Grants of injunctive relief, temporary restraining orders.

(1) The director, through the attorney general, may prosecute an action in any court of competent jurisdiction to enforce any order made by him or her pursuant to this chapter and shall not be required to post a bond in any such court proceedings.

(2) If the director has cause to believe that any person has violated any penal provision of this chapter he or she may refer the violation to the attorney general or the prosecuting attorney of the county in which the offense was committed.

(3) Whenever the director has cause to believe that any person, required to be licensed by this chapter, is conducting business as an escrow agent without a valid license, or that any licensed escrow agent, directly or through an agent or employee, is engaged in any false, unfair and deceptive, or misleading advertising or promotional, activity or business practices, or is conducting business in a manner deemed unsafe or injurious to the public, or has violated, is violating, or is about to violate any of the provisions of this chapter, or a rule or order under this chapter, the director, through the attorney general, may bring an action in any court of competent jurisdiction to enjoin the person from continuing the violation or doing any action in furtherance thereof. Upon proper showing, injunctive relief or temporary restraining orders shall be granted by the court and a receiver or conservator may be appointed.

(4) The attorney general and the several prosecuting attorneys throughout the state may prosecute proceedings brought pursuant to this chapter upon notification of the director.

[ 1999 c 30 s 18; 1977 ex.s. c 156 s 10; 1965 c 153 s 17. Formerly RCW 18.44.160.]